Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.585

Charging session—Consumer data disclosure.

If an electric vehicle service provider sells or intends to sell consumer data collected during or associated with a charging session, the electric vehicle service provider shall disclose all types of data collected to the consumer.

[ 2021 c 238 s 13.]

NOTES:

Contingent effective date—2021 c 238 s 13: "Section 13 of this act takes effect only if chapter . . . (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5062), Laws of 2021 is not enacted by June 30, 2021." [ 2021 c 238 s 14.]